Washington statutes.
RCW 2.06.010

Court of appeals established—Definitions.

There is hereby established a court of appeals as a court of record. For the purpose of RCW 2.06.010 through 2.06.100 the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) "Rules" means rules of the supreme court.

(2) "Chief justice" means chief justice of the supreme court.

(3) "Court" means court of appeals.

(4) "Judge" means judge of the court of appeals.

(5) "Division" means a division of the court of appeals.

(6) "District" means a geographic subdivision of a division from which judges of the court of appeals are elected.

(7) "General election" means the biennial election at which members of the house of representatives are elected.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 221 s 1.]